Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 3. Death Inquests.

Sec. 09.55.062.
Death inquests.

Upon petition by the state medical examiner or a state prosecutor, a judicial officer shall conduct proceedings under AS

09.55.062

—

09.55.069

to determine the cause and manner of a person’s death. The prosecutor shall present the evidence in the death inquest and assist the court in instructing the jury and conducting the inquest only when the inquest is based on a petition filed by the prosecutor or when the prosecutor requests to participate in the proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1996)

Sec. 09.55.064.
Jurors for inquest.

When a death inquest is to be held under AS

09.55.062

—

09.55.069

, the judicial officer shall promptly summon six persons qualified by law to serve as jurors to appear before the court.

When six jurors attend as required under (a) of this section, they shall be sworn by the court to

inquire into the identity of the deceased, and when, where, and by what means the person died;

inquire into the circumstances attending the death; and

give a true verdict according to the evidence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1996)

Sec. 09.55.066.
Subpoena and examination of witnesses.

The judicial officer or a prosecuting attorney may, when necessary to determine the material facts relating to the death, subpoena and examine witnesses for a proceeding under AS

09.55.062

—

09.55.069

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1996)

Sec. 09.55.068.
Verdict of inquest jury.

After hearing the testimony, the jury or two thirds of its number shall give its written verdict, signed and setting out

the name of the deceased and when, where, and by what means the deceased died; and

whether the deceased was killed or the death was occasioned by the act of another by criminal means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1996)

Sec. 09.55.069.
Compensation and expenses allowed.

The members of the jury and witnesses in an inquest under AS

09.55.062

—

09.55.069

are entitled to the same compensation as in civil actions in a district court, and the compensation and other incidental expenses shall be audited and allowed as in the case of other similar expenses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 33 SLA 1999)

Legislative history reports. —

For the purpose of the amendment made to this section by
ch. 33, SLA 1999, (CSSB 42(JUD)), see 1999 Senate Journal Supp. No. 5.

Secs. 09.55.070 — 09.55.230.
[Renumbered as AS 25.24.010 — 25.24.180.]

Secs. 09.55.231 — 09.55.237.
[Renumbered as AS 25.24.200 — 25.24.260.]

Sec. 09.55.238.
[Renumbered as AS 25.24.300.]